Louisiana, session 2026, SB357.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:72.1, 74, 76, and 353(B) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 13:103.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§72.1. Declaration of state law to federal or other courts
A. The supreme court of this state may, by rule of court, provide that when
it shall appear to the Supreme Court of the United States, or to any court of appeals
of the United States, or to the courts of last resort of other states, that there are
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 357 ENROLLED
involved, in any proceeding before it, questions or propositions of the laws of this
state, which are determinative of the said cause, and there is no clear controlling
precedent in the decisions of the supreme court of this state, such federal appellate
court may certify such questions or propositions of the laws of this state to the
supreme court of this state for instructions concerning such questions or propositions
of state law, which certificate the supreme court of this state may, by written opinion,
answer.
B. The supreme court of this state is hereby authorized and empowered to
adopt all rules it deems appropriate to administer this Section and to collaborate
with any and all other courts of last resort of other states and of the United States in
the preparation and approval of uniform rules of court to make effective this and
similar laws. The provisions of Subsection A of this Section are applicable and
operative only to the extent of any rules duly adopted by the supreme court.
* * *
§74. Crier for Supreme Court; salary
There shall may be a crier one or more criers for the supreme court, who
shall be appointed by the judges of the supreme court from among the court's
security personnel, and be commissioned by the civil sheriff for the parish of
Orleans as a deputy sheriff. The crier shall receive from the state treasury on his own
warrant approved by the chief justice the sum of thirty-one hundred dollars, per
annum, payable monthly. Security personnel commissioned pursuant to this
Section shall be considered members of a bona fide police agency and may
additionally be designated by the court as requiring statewide police power
pursuant to R.S. 40:1379.1 in the same manner as provided for in Subsection N
of that Section. Upon request, the deputy secretary of public safety services, or
his designee, may also facilitate additional security assistance for the court.
* * *
§76. Facsimile Filing, case management, and related technology in state courts;
uniform plan
A. The supreme court may provide for the development of a comprehensive
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 357 ENROLLED
and uniform plan for the use of facsimile filing, case management, and related
technology by and in the courts of this state. In exercising this authority, the court
may appoint advisory committees or working groups with members representing
judges, clerks of court, practicing attorneys in civil and criminal law, law
enforcement, researchers and other users of court records, and others whose expertise
and experience will assist in the preparation of the plan. The court may provide for
the implementation of the plan through recommended legislation.
B. This Section is only applicable to appellate courts.
* * *
§103.1. Expenses of the supreme court
A. Any justice whose primary residence is more than fifty miles from the
courthouse may elect all or part of any amount due under R.S. 13:103 to be
reimbursed as a vouchered expense or otherwise allowed pursuant to an
accountable plan maintained in accordance with Title 26 of the United States
Code, provided that the election shall be for an entire year, and the total
amount elected or claimed under this Subsection as vouchered expenses actually
incurred that would otherwise be unreimbursed, together with any amount
otherwise remaining payable under R.S. 13:103 as a taxable allowance for
expenses after any partial election or lack of election under this Subsection,
shall not exceed the amounts otherwise provided for under R.S. 13:103 for each
month.
B. Reimbursement for other official expenses paid from available funds
shall be subject to the court's duly adopted rules , including rules concerning
any reimbursement, allowances, or payment of expenses concerning mileage,
other travel, or related to performing official duties within the respective
districts for those justices with a primary residence more than a fifty-mile
round trip from the courthouse.
C. Any amounts reimbursed or payable under this Section shall not be
considered employee compensation for the purposes of any public retirement
system.
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 357 ENROLLED
D.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
amount paid as per diem for attending to official duties in the parish of the
courthouse and related travel shall not exceed the maximum daily expense rate
allowed for employees of the United States for travel to that location as
established by the United States General Services Administration, or its
successor, with the limit for a particular fiscal year measured by the amount
applicable ninety days before its commencement.
(2) The court shall adopt rules implementing this Subsection including
related and similar limitations concerning to the performance of judicial duties
at other locations in the state when necessary. Any amounts due pursuant to this
Subsection shall be subject to an annual limit not to exceed a total of ten per
month. This Subsection is applicable to any justice who is eligible to make an
election under Subsection A of this Section.
* * *
§353. Clerks; sheriff; superintendent of police
* * *
B. The sheriff of the respective parishes in which the courts of appeal for the
first, second, third, and fifth circuits are domiciled, or one of his deputies, shall
provide security for and attend each session of the court to and when necessary,
execute the orders of the court.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:2405(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2405. Peace officer training requirements; reimbursement by peace officer
* * *
B.(1) Additionally, the receipt of supplemental pay from the municipal police
officers fund, the deputy sheriffs' fund, the state police fund, or out of the funds
appropriated for military police by the Military Department, state of Louisiana, shall
be contingent upon the recipient's beginning employment as a peace officer after
January 1, 1986, successfully completing a council-approved training program, and
passing the council-approved examination within one calendar year from date of
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 357 ENROLLED
initial employment.
(2) Certified security personnel of the Supreme Court of Louisiana or of any
court of appeal of the state, except those already duly commissioned as deputy
sheriffs under R.S. 13:74, shall not be eligible to receive supplemental pay benefits
even though the peace officer has successfully completed a council-approved
training program. The commission issued to court security personnel shall remain
in force and in effect at the pleasure of the employing court.
* * *
Section 3. Code of Civil Procedure Article 157(A) and (B)(2) are hereby amended
and reenacted and Code of Civil Procedure Article 157(C) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 157. Recusal of supreme court justice
A. A party desiring to recuse a justice of the supreme court shall file a written
motion therefor assigning the ground for recusal under Article 151. When a written
motion is filed to recuse a justice of the supreme court, the justice may recuse
himself or refer the motion shall to be heard by the other justices of the court.
B. When a justice of the supreme court recuses himself or is recused by a
majority of the other justices, the court may do one of the following:
* * *
(2) Appoint a retired justice of the supreme court or a sitting or retired
judge of a district court or a court of appeal having the qualifications of a justice of
the supreme court, other than age, as a justice ad hoc to act for the recused justice
in the hearing and disposition of the cause.
C. A referred recusal motion shall be denied unless a majority of the
other justices serving in the case when the motion is filed find sufficient grounds
for recusal under Article 151.
Section 4. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 679(E) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 679. Recusal of an appellate judge and a supreme court justice
* * *
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 357 ENROLLED
E. When a justice of the supreme court recuses himself or is recused by a
majority of the other justices, the court may have the cause argued before and
disposed of by the other justices or appoint a retired justice of the supreme court
or sitting or retired judge of a district court or of a court of appeal having the
qualifications of a justice of the supreme court, other than age, to sit as a member
of the court in the hearing and disposition of the cause. A referred recusal motion
shall be denied unless a majority of the other justices serving in the case when
the motion is filed find sufficient grounds for recusal under Article 671.
Section 5. R.S. 13:75 and 353(C) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions
of R.S. 13:103.1 shall not prohibit a justice of the supreme court from having a district office
located anywhere within a parish from which the justice has been previously elected
notwithstanding that his primary work location is otherwise to be in his district.
Section 7. This Section and Sections 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration
of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article
III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently
approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such
approval. Section 2 of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.